Massachusetts, session 194th, H3122.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.Chapter 63 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 38FF the following section:
SECTION 38GG. (a) Any private institution of higher learning that has an endowment
fund with aggregate funds in excess of $1,000,000,000 shall be subject to an annual excise of 2.5
per cent of all monies in aggregate in said endowment fund. For the purposes of this section an
endowment fund shall be an institutional fund, which may consist of multiple funds, of a private
institution of higher learning not wholly expendable by the institution on a current basis under
the terms of the applicable gift instrument. All monies collected from this annual excise shall be
deposited in the Educational Opportunity for All Trust Fund established by subsection (b) of this
section.
of 3

(b) There is hereby established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate
fund to be known as the Educational Opportunity for All Trust Fund, hereinafter called the fund.
The fund shall be administered by the executive office of education, as directed by the
Educational Opportunity for All Trust Fund Board of Trustees established in subsection (c), and
in consultation with the department of higher education and the department of early education
and care. The fund shall be used exclusively for the purposes of subsidizing the cost of higher
education, early education and child care for lower-income and middle-class residents of the
commonwealth. No expenditure from the fund shall cause the fund to be in deficiency at the
close of a fiscal year.
(c) The Educational Opportunity Trust Fund shall be managed by a board to be known as
the Educational Opportunity for All Trust Fund Board of Trustees, hereby established, which
shall have general supervision of the trust and shall direct all expenditures from the fund. The
full duties and obligations of the board shall be set forth in a declaration of trust to be adopted by
the board. The board of trustees shall consist of 7 trustees, including the commissioner of the
department of higher education or a designee, the commissioner of the department of early
education & care or a designee, and 5 additional trustees, 1 of whom shall have demonstrated
expertise in higher education appointed by the President of the Senate, 1 of whom shall have
demonstrated expertise in early education and child care appointed by the Speaker of the House,
1 of whom shall have demonstrated expertise in representing the child care workforce as a leader
in a labor organization appointed by the President of the Senate, 1 of whom shall be an employee
of a Massachusetts community college as defined in section 10 of Chapter 15A appointed by the
Speaker of the House, and 1 of whom shall be an employee of a private institution of higher
learning subject to
of 3

the annual excise tax established in subsection (a) of this section appointed by the
secretary of education. The appointed trustees shall serve for terms of two years. Trustees shall
be eligible for reappointment. The members of the board shall elect 1 of the trustees to serve as
the chair.
of 3